California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Any action or proceedings wherein the validity of the levy or collection of the retail transactions and use tax, or any proceedings in relation thereto, is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced not later than July 1, 1990; otherwise the retail transactions and use tax and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal, enforceable, and incontestable.

(b) Any action or proceedings wherein the validity of the issuance of any bonds, or any proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied
 shall be commenced not later than July 1, 1990, or, in the case of bonds authorized to be issued after that date, within six months from the date the bonds are authorized to be issued by the district; otherwise, in each case, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal, enforceable, and incontestable.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes the validity of the retail transactions and use tax or of any bonds or any related proceedings from being established by an action brought under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or pursuant to any other procedure established by law, before the end of any period of time specified in subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1120, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Investments [103390. - 103393.]

103390.

Subject to any agreement or covenant between the district and the holders of any of its obligations limiting or restricting classes of investments, the district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, reserve fund, or other fund created or established for the benefit of holders of any outstanding obligations of the district, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by
 the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(e) In any investment in which county funds may be placed pursuant to the general laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103391.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103392.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may, from time to time, be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103393.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Construction Manager/General Contractor Project Delivery Contracts [103394. - 103399.1.]

103394.

For purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” or “CMGC” means the Construction Manager/General Contractor method as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6951 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) “Construction manager” means a construction manager as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6951 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103395.

(a) Subject to the limitations of this article, the district may utilize the CMGC project delivery method for public transit projects within its jurisdiction.

(b) The district may enter into a CMGC project delivery method contract pursuant to this article if, after evaluation of the traditional design-bid-build process of construction and of the CMGC project delivery method in a public meeting, the district makes a written finding that use of the CMGC project delivery method on the specific project under consideration will accomplish one or more of the following objectives: reduce project costs, expedite the project’s completion, or provide features not achievable through the design-bid-build method. This finding shall be made prior to the
 district entering into a CMGC project delivery method contract. In the CMGC project delivery method proposal, the written findings shall be included as part of an application for state funds for a transit project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103396.

Any public works project that is contracted for pursuant to this article shall be subject to the requirements of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 87.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103397.

(a) If a contract for CMGC services is entered into pursuant to this article and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the district shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services, under which the district shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the district and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period; provided, however, the district shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the district has entered into a
 services contract. A preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discrete phase or phases of the project and shall provide for the district to own the design plans and other preconstruction services work product.

(b) A contract for construction services will be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the district may award the contract for construction services utilizing any other procurement method authorized by law.

(c) The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager
 shall be bid to subcontractors pursuant to Section 6955 of the Public Contracts Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103398.

Nothing in this article affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.

(a) Upon completion of a project using the CMGC project delivery method, the district shall prepare a progress report to the board of directors. The progress report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the project.

(2) The entity that was awarded the project.

(3) The estimated and actual costs of the project.

(4) The estimated and actual schedule for project completion.

(5) A description of any written protests concerning
 any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the project, including, but not limited to, the resolution of the protests.

(6) An assessment of the prequalification process and criteria utilized under this article.

(7) A description of the method used to evaluate the bid or proposal, including the weighting of each factor and an assessment of the impact of this requirement on a project.

(8) A description of any challenges or unexpected problems that arose during the construction of the project and a description of the solutions that were considered and ultimately implemented to address those challenges and problems.

(9) Recommendations to improve the CMCG project delivery method authorized under this article.

(b) The progress report shall be made available on the district’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.1.

(a) The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(b) Contracts awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid until the project is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Job Order Contracting [103399.5. - 103399.11.]

103399.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Article 19 (commencing with Section 20330) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the district may use the procurement method outlined in this article for a job order contract.

(2) The district shall not contract for work that is protected by applicable collective bargaining agreements. All job order contracts shall comply
 with all district collective bargaining agreements.

(3) Job order contracts of the district shall be competitively bid and awarded to bidders providing qualified responsive bids.

(4) Job order contracts shall be for repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices. No annual contracts may be awarded for any new construction.

(5) A job order contract shall be subject to a project labor agreement between the district and the San Mateo Building Trades Council, or an amendment or extension to that agreement.

(b) Solicitations for job order contracts shall progress as follows:

(1) The
 district shall prepare a set of solicitation documents for job order contracts. The documents shall include a unit price catalog or other established unit prices, job order contract terms, job order contract technical specifications, and any other information the district deems necessary to adequately describe the district’s needs.

(2) An architect, engineer, consultant, or contractor retained by the district to assist in the development of the job order contract solicitation documents shall not be eligible to bid or to participate in the preparation of a job order contract bid.

(3) The district may award multiple job order contracts in response to a single job order contract solicitation.

(c) The district shall
 develop a system for evaluating job order contract bids for awarding job order contracts.

(d) The award of a job order contract shall progress as follows:

(1) The district shall prepare a request for bids for job order contracts based on the solicitation documents prepared under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that invites job order contractors to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the district.

(2) Each bidding job order contractor shall include in its bid one or more adjustment factors to the established unit prices provided in the request for bids based on the contract’s technical specifications.

(3) Each bidding job order contractor shall agree to identify
 any subcontractors to be used for the job orders performed pursuant to the job order contract.

(4) The award of job order contracts, if any, shall be made to a job order contractor or to job order contractors that the district determines to be qualified and responsive based upon preestablished criteria to be determined by the district.

(5) The job order contractors shall comply with the district’s project labor agreement, as applicable.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the district, by a process determined by the district, may award any job order for repair or renovation work with a value equal to or less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to a job order contractor that is also a certified small
 business enterprise, as established by the district’s small business enterprise certification process or any similar certification process acceptable to the district, or to a job order contractor that is also a disabled veterans business enterprise, as certified by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.6.

(a) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a single job order contract shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the initial contract term of the job order contract. No single job order may exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months and may be extended or renewed for two subsequent annual terms and a maximum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the contract.

(c) Work shall not be split or separated into smaller job orders for the purpose
 of evading the cost limits of the article.

(d) Dollar amounts specified in this section may be adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.7.

(a) All work bid under job order contracts shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and is subject to all of the penalties and provisions set forth in that chapter.

(b) For purposes of this article, if a job order contractor chooses to use a subcontractor, the job order contractor shall verify that the subcontractor possesses and maintains the appropriate licenses and credentials required.

(c) If the district, after conducting an administrative due process review, determines that there has been a violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with
 Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, including, but not limited to, bid shopping by the job order contractor, the district may terminate the job order contract, declare the contractor ineligible for future job order contracts for a period of time to be determined by the district, or withdraw authorization for the contractor to proceed with awarded work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.8.

(a) A job order contract shall set forth in the general conditions of the job order contract the party or parties responsible for seeing that Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code is complied with.

(b) For purposes of job order contracting, prevailing wages shall apply to all work ordered under the job order contract regardless of thresholds set forth in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code.

(c) The job order contractor shall pay the prevailing wage in effect at the time the job order contract is issued by the district and all increases as published
 by the Department of Industrial Relations for the term of the job order contract, including all overtime, holiday, and shift provisions published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(d) The district shall designate one individual to act as a monitor to inspect job sites for labor compliance violations at the request of the designated labor representative in its project labor agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.9.

In order to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse, the district shall prepare for each individual job order developed under a job order contract an independent cost estimate. The estimate shall be prepared before the receipt of any job order contractor’s estimate for the work and shall be compared to the job order contractor’s estimate to determine the reasonableness of that estimate before issuance of any job order. If the district finds the job order contractor’s estimate to perform work for a given job order to be unreasonable, not cost effective, or undesirable, the district may elect not to issue the job order to the job order contractor, and may, instead, use any other available procurement procedures or choose not to move forward with the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.10.

(a) The district shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2030, a report on the use of job order contracting under this article. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the district’s system for evaluating job order contract bids for award of job order contracts, including, but not limited to, the criteria used by the district to determine a qualified and responsive job order contractor.

(2) A description of each job order contract awarded and the contractor awarded the
 contract.

(3) An assessment of the use of job order contracting under this article.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 103399.11.)
-------------------------------------------

103399.11.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 13, commencing with Sec. 103399.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Personnel [103400. - 103451.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employee Relations [103400. - 103407.]

103400.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103401.

Any question which may arise with respect to whether a majority of employees in an appropriate unit desire to be represented by a labor organization shall be submitted to the Public Employment Relations Board. In resolving those questions of representation, including the determination of the appropriate unit or units, petitions, and the conduct of hearings and elections, the director shall apply the relevant federal law
 and administrative practice developed under the Labor Management Relations Act, 1947, as amended, and, for this purpose, shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations.

The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall administer any rules and regulations and shall provide for a prompt public hearing and secret ballot election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties.

Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within the collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later, except that no collective bargaining agreement shall be considered to be a bar to representation proceedings for
 a period of more than two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 134.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

103402.

Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization and upon determining, as provided in Section 103401, that the labor organization represents at least a majority of the employees in the appropriate unit, the board and the accredited representative of employees shall bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103403.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made with any labor organization, association, or group that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence. 

(b) The district shall not discriminate with regard to
 employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

103404.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, either party may request mediation services of the State Conciliation Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103405.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement either on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, upon the agreement of both the district and the representatives of the employees, the dispute may be submitted to an arbitration board.

The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the
 selection of a fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the State Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be designated as the fifth arbitrator and chairman of the board of arbitration. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties thereto.

Each party shall be responsible for the expense of the presentation of its case. All other expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties and the expenses may include the making of a verbatim record of the proceedings and transcript of that record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103406.

In the event the district and the representatives of the employees do not agree to submit any dispute to arbitration as provided in Section 103405, the State Conciliation Service may be notified by either party that a dispute exists and there is no agreement to arbitrate.

Following such notification, the State Conciliation Service shall determine whether or not the dispute may be resolved by the parties and, if not, the issues concerning which the dispute exists. Upon such determination, the service shall certify its findings to the Governor of the State of California. The Governor shall, within 10 days of receipt of
 certification, appoint a factfinding commission consisting of three persons.

The commission shall immediately convene and inquire into and investigate the issues in the dispute. The commission shall have authority to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of books, documents, and other records. Subpoenas shall be served and enforced in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1985), Title 3, Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The commission shall report to the Governor within 30 days of the date of its creation.

After the creation of such a commission, and for 30 days after such commission has made its report to the Governor, no change, except by mutual agreement, shall be made by the parties to the controversy in the conditions out of which the dispute arose, and service to the public shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103407.

In the event an exclusive collective bargaining representative is selected pursuant to Section 103401, the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500), Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code are not applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rights of Employees of Existing Facilities [103420. - 103421.]

103420.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by such utility for at least 75 days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination. These employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or
 other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103421.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system. The outstanding obligations and liabilities of such public utility by reason of such pension plan shall be considered and taken into account and allowance made therefor in the purchase price of such public utility. The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in this section and the benefits which are provided
 shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pension Plan [103440. - 103442.]

103440.

The adoption, terms, and conditions of a pension plan covering employees of the district in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such organization and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103441.

The board may contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and enter all, or any portion, of its employees under such system; provided, that no employees of the district in a bargaining unit which is represented by a labor organization shall be included in such contract except as authorized by a collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103442.

All persons receiving pension benefits from an acquired public utility, and all persons entitled to pension benefits under any pension plan of such acquired public utility, may become members or receive pensions under a pension plan established by the district by mutual agreement of such persons and the district. Such agreement may provide for the waiver of all rights, privileges, benefits, and status with respect to the pension plan of such acquired public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Benefits [103450. - 103451.]

103450.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under Subchapter II of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103451.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the workmen’s compensation, unemployment compensation, and disability and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds and Other Evidences of Indebtedness [103500. - 103602.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization and Issuance of General Obligation Bonds [103500. - 103513.]

103500.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, or repair of any or all improvements, works, property or facilities, authorized by this part or necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the powers of the district, or for any other purpose authorized by this part, it shall, by ordinance, adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district; provided the total amount of bonds issued and
 outstanding pursuant to this article shall not exceed 15 percent of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county. The ordinance shall state:

(a) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of such purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The estimated cost of accomplishing such purposes.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(d) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 50 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 7 percent per annum.

(f) The proposition to be submitted to the voters, which may include one or more purposes.

(g) The date of the election.

(h) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for or against the measure.

(i) The ordinance may also contain, a statement that the transaction and use tax imposed
 pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 103350) of Chapter 5, or a stated portion thereof, shall be levied, or continued to be levied, and used to the extent required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as they become due, to provide for any sinking fund payments required therefor, or to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor.

(j) The ordinance may also contain any other matters authorized by this part or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103501.

Notice of the holding of such election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the ordinance calling for election in at least one newspaper published in such district. No other notice of such election need be given. Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, the election shall be conducted as other district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103502.

If any proposition is defeated by the electors, the board shall not call another election on a substantially similar proposition to be held within six months after the prior election. If a petition requesting submission of such a proposition, signed by 15 percent of the district electors, as shown by the votes cast for all candidates for Governor within the district at the last gubernatorial election, is filed with the board, it may call an election before the expiration of six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103503.

If 60 percent of the electors voting on the proposition vote for it, then the board may, by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized and may from time to time, by resolution, provide for the issuance of such amounts as the necessity thereof may appear, until the full amount of such bonds authorized shall have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on an anniversary of its date. The maximum term the bonds of any series shall run
 before maturity shall not exceed 50 years from the date of each series respectively. In such resolution or resolutions, the board shall prescribe the form of the bonds (including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds) and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103504.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 7 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds, or any series thereof, may be for any period not exceeding one year as determined by the board. In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of such bonds, the board may also provide for call and redemption of such bonds prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as it may specify, provided that no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon. The denomination
 or denominations of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The principal of, and interest on, such bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district. The bonds, or such series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairman of the board and the treasurer. All such signatures, countersignatures, and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of such signatures or countersignatures on the bonds shall be manually affixed. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds, his signature is as effective as if he had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103505.

The bonds may be sold as the board determines by resolution, but for not less than par. Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103506.

The delivery of any bonds shall be at the office of the district treasurer, and the purchase price may be received in cash or cashier check.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103507.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes for which the debt was incurred (which purposes shall be in conformity with an approved general transit plan or element thereof then in effect); provided, however, that when such purposes have been accomplished, any moneys remaining in such improvement fund (a) shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of
 principal of, and interest on, the bonds, or (b) shall be placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of outstanding bonds of the district from time to time in the open market at such prices and in such manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as the board may determine. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103508.
